Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-402
Veterans aid; conscientious objectors denied relief.

No benefit shall accrue to, and none of the provisions of sections 80-401 to 80-405 shall apply to conscientious objectors who availed themselves of the privilege of any exemption from military duty.

Laws 1921, c. 40, § 1, p. 181;

C.S.1922, § 6206;

Laws 1923, c. 126, § 1, p. 311;

Laws 1927, c. 194, § 1, p. 552;

C.S.1929, § 80-401;

R.S.1943, § 80-402.